Nebraska, session 109, LB448.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB448 LB448
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Postconviction Relief Act.
Sec. 2. Section 29-3001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-3001 (1) A prisoner in custody under sentence and claiming a
right to be released on a the ground listed in subsection (2) of this
section that there was such a denial or infringement of the rights of the
prisoner as to render the judgment void or voidable under the
Constitution of this state or the Constitution of the United States, may
file a verified motion, in the court which imposed such sentence, stating
the grounds relied upon and asking the court to vacate or set aside the
sentence.
(2) The following shall constitute grounds for relief under this
section:
(a) There was such a denial or infringement of the rights of the
prisoner as to render the judgment void or voidable under the
Constitution of Nebraska or the Constitution of the United States; or
(b) The prisoner is actually innocent.
(3)(a) To establish actual innocence:
(i) The prisoner must present evidence of actual innocence that was
not presented at trial. This may include, but is not limited to:
Exculpatory DNA testing results; evidence implicating an alternative
suspect, including third-party confessions; impeachment evidence of
state's witnesses; or relevant forensic scientific evidence that
undermines other evidence presented at trial, including forensic
evidence; and
(ii) The prisoner must prove by clear and convincing evidence that
there is a reasonable likelihood that the factfinder's consideration of
such evidence would have resulted in a different outcome at trial.
(b) Forensic scientific evidence shall be considered undermined if
new research or information exists that repudiates:
-2-

LB448 LB448
2025 2025
(i) The foundational validity of the challenged evidence or
testimony; or
(ii) The applied validity of the method or technique.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Applied validity means the reliability of the method or
technique in practice; and
(ii) Foundational validity means the reliability of the method to be
repeatable, reproducible, and accurate in a scientific setting.
(4) (2) Unless the motion and the files and records of the case show
to the satisfaction of the court that the prisoner is entitled to no
relief, the court shall cause notice thereof to be served on the county
attorney, grant a prompt hearing thereon, and determine the issues and
make findings of fact and conclusions of law with respect thereto. If the
court finds that there are grounds for relief under subsection (2) of
this section was such a denial or infringement of the rights of the
prisoner as to render the judgment void or voidable under the
Constitution of this state or the Constitution of the United States, the
court shall vacate and set aside the judgment and shall discharge the
prisoner or resentence the prisoner or grant a new trial as may appear
appropriate. Proceedings under the Postconviction Relief Act provisions
of sections 29-3001 to 29-3004 shall be civil in nature. Costs shall be
taxed as in habeas corpus cases.
(5) (3) A court may entertain and determine such motion without
requiring the production of the prisoner, whether or not a hearing is
held. Testimony of the prisoner or other witnesses may be offered by
deposition. The court need not entertain a second motion or successive
motions for similar relief on behalf of the same prisoner.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, a (4) A
one-year period of limitation shall apply to the filing of a verified
motion for postconviction relief. The one-year limitation period shall
run from the later of:
-3-

LB448 LB448
2025 2025
(a) The date the judgment of conviction became final by the
conclusion of a direct appeal or the expiration of the time for filing a
direct appeal;
(b) The date on which the factual predicate of the constitutional
claim or claims alleged could have been discovered through the exercise
of due diligence;
(c) The date on which an impediment created by state action, in
violation of the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of
Nebraska or any law of this state, is removed, if the prisoner was
prevented from filing a verified motion by such state action;
(d) The date on which a constitutional claim asserted was initially
recognized by the Supreme Court of the United States or the Nebraska
Supreme Court, if the newly recognized right has been made applicable
retroactively to cases on postconviction collateral review; or
(e) The date on which the Supreme Court of the United States denies
a writ of certiorari or affirms a conviction appealed from the Nebraska
Supreme Court. This subdivision only applies if, within thirty days after
petitioning the Supreme Court of the United States for a writ of
certiorari, the prisoner files a notice in the district court of
conviction stating that the prisoner has filed such petition.
(7)(a) Any procedural default or time limitation may be excused by
the court to prevent a manifest injustice.
(b) In determining whether to excuse a procedural default or time
limitation under this subsection due to a manifest injustice, the court's
inquiry shall be limited to determining whether the prisoner makes a
colorable claim of actual innocence.
(8) Failure to bring an ineffective assistance of trial counsel
claim on direct appeal shall not result in the procedural default of that
claim.
Sec. 3. Section 29-3002, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-4-

LB448 LB448
2025 2025
29-3002 An order sustaining or overruling a motion filed under
section 2 of this act sections 29-3001 to 29-3004 shall be deemed to be a
final judgment, and an appeal may be taken from the district court as
provided for in appeals in civil cases. A prisoner may, in the discretion
of the appellate court and upon application to the appellate court, be
released on such recognizance as the appellate court fixes pending the
determination of the appeal.
Sec. 4. Section 29-3003, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-3003 The remedy provided by the Postconviction Relief Act
sections 29-3001 to 29-3004 is cumulative and is not intended to be
concurrent with any other remedy existing in the courts of this state.
Any proceeding filed under the Postconviction Relief Act provisions of
sections 29-3001 to 29-3004 which states facts which if true would
constitute grounds for relief under another remedy shall be dismissed
without prejudice.
Sec. 5. Section 29-3004, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-3004 The district court may appoint not to exceed two attorneys
to represent the prisoners in all proceedings under the Postconviction
Relief Act sections 29-3001 to 29-3004. The district court, upon hearing
the application, shall fix reasonable expenses and fees, and the county
board shall allow payment to the attorney or attorneys in the full amount
determined by the court. The attorney or attorneys shall be competent and
shall provide effective counsel.
Sec. 6. (1) Upon request of the prisoner, the district court may
order that:
(a) The prisoner's prior trial or appellate counsel make available
to the prisoner such counsel's complete files relating to the case that
is the subject of the proceedings under the Postconviction Relief Act;
and
-5-

LB448 LB448
2025 2025
(b) The county attorney or other prosecutor make available to the
prisoner the complete files of all law enforcement and prosecutorial
agencies involved in the investigation or prosecution of the prisoner.
(2) Upon request of the prisoner, the district court may order that
discovery be allowed as provided in sections 29-1912 to 29-1921 if the
court finds that such discovery could assist the prisoner in
investigating, preparing, or presenting a motion for relief under section
2 of this act.
Sec. 7. Section 29-3915, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-3915 The following persons who are financially unable to obtain
counsel shall be entitled to be represented by a judicial district public
defender:
(1) A person charged with a felony, including appeals from
convictions for a felony;
(2) A person pursuing a postconviction proceeding under the
Postconviction Relief Act sections 29-3001 to 29-3004 after conviction of
a felony, when the public defender after investigation concludes that
there may be merit to such a proceeding or when the court in which such
proceeding is pending directs the public defender to represent the
person;
(3) A minor brought before the juvenile court when neither the minor
nor his or her parent or guardian is able to afford counsel; and
(4) A person against whom a petition has been filed with a mental
health board as provided in sections 71-945 to 71-947.
Sec. 8. Original sections 29-3002, 29-3003, 29-3004, and 29-3915,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 29-3001, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-6-